Washington statutes.
RCW 7.98.030

Crime victim certification steering committee.

The office of crime victims advocacy shall convene a crime victim certification steering committee within ninety days of June 7, 2018. The office of crime victims advocacy shall provide administrative support for the committee. The committee must include members representing immigrant communities, law enforcement, prosecutors, the criminal justice training commission, providers of services to survivors of crime victims including domestic violence, sexual assault, human trafficking, and other crimes, a representative from the department of labor and industries charged with enforcement of workplace standards, and may include other entities concerned with victim safety and effective collaboration between immigrant communities and local law enforcement entities. The members of the committee shall serve without compensation. Members are reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, subject to available resources and other limitations in chapter 43.03 RCW. The committee is responsible for the following:

(1) Monitoring compliance under this chapter;

(2) Developing and implementing training of law enforcement, prosecutors, victim advocates, state agency personnel, court personnel, and others about this chapter;

(3) Dissemination of information about this chapter to affected communities and the general public;

(4) Establishing mechanisms by which the public can report concerns and recommendations regarding implementation of this chapter;

(5) Identifying implementation issues and other trends, and providing recommendations to the governor and the legislature for addressing these issues;

(6) Other responsibilities relating to this chapter identified by the committee.

[ 2018 c 86 s 5.]